Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-2821
Electronic transmission, defined.

Electronic transmission means transmission of information in electronic form. Electronic transmission may include computer-to-computer transmission or computer-to-facsimile transmission.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 917.